California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The legislative body shall not change any boundaries or acquisitions and improvements, except after notice of intention to do so is published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in the newspaper in which the resolution of intention was published. The notice shall specify a time for hearing objections to the proposed change, which shall be not less than twenty (20) days after the first publication of the notice. If a change proposed is to include additional real property in the district, the clerk of the legislative body shall also mail a copy of the notice, postage prepaid, to each person to whom real property in the area proposed to be added is assessed as shown on the last equalized assessment roll, at his address as shown upon the roll, and to each person, whether owner in fee or having a lien upon, or legal or equitable interest in, any such real property, whose name and address and a designation of the real property in which he is interested is on file in the office of the clerk. The notice shall be mailed at least 20 days prior to the time set for hearing objections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1870.)
-------------------------------------------

35271.

Written objections to any proposed change may be filed with the clerk of the legislative body by any interested person at any time prior to the hour set for hearing them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35272.

The legislative body shall hear and pass upon objections to proposed changes at the time appointed or at any time to which the hearing may be adjourned. Its decision shall be final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35272.5.

If the boundaries are changed, protests objecting to the formation of the district made by owners of real property excluded by the change shall not be counted in computing a majority protest as hereinbefore provided, but written protests objecting to the formation of the district made by owners of real property remaining in the district and by the owners of real property added by the change and filed not later than the time fixed for hearing objections to such change shall be counted in computing a majority protest as hereinbefore provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35273.

At the conclusion of the hearing fixed by the resolution of intention, if no majority protest is on file and if all protests and objections, including protests and objections to changes, have been overruled and denied, the legislative body may proceed further under this part, and may adopt an ordinance declaring that the parking district is formed and describing the acquisitions and improvements to be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35273.1.

The legislative body shall not pass any ordinance forming a district under this part until it shall have procured such information as it deems necessary and adequate to enable it to determine whether there is public need for such facilities, whether the proposed district approximately covers the contiguous area needing such facilities, whether sufficient property within the proposed district will be benefited thereby, and whether the proposed improvements are located and designed in the manner most compatible with the greatest public good and the least private injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 695.)
-------------------------------------------

35274.

Any district formed pursuant to this part may be named “Parking District No. ____ of the City of ____.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35275.

Any objections or protests not made at the time and in the manner provided in this chapter are deemed waived voluntarily. Proceedings under this chapter shall not be attacked after the conclusion of the hearing upon any ground not stated in an objection or protest filed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35276.

No action, proceeding or defense to correct, set aside, cancel, avoid, annul or otherwise attack any proceedings under this part up to and including the adoption of the ordinance declaring the district formed shall be maintained by any person unless such action, proceeding or defense is commenced or made within 30 days after the adoption of such ordinance. No action, proceeding or defense to correct, set aside, cancel, avoid, annul or otherwise attack any proceedings under this part taken subsequent to the adoption of said ordinance, including but not limited to proceedings taken and determinations made pursuant to Sections 35402 and 35402.3, shall be maintained by any person unless such action, proceeding or defense is commenced or made within 30 days after the taking of such proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.1. Use of City Lands as Parking Places [35300. - 35305.]

35300.

As used in this chapter, the term “city lands” means lands already owned by the city which are located within the boundaries of an existing or proposed district and which are either being used for the purpose of public off-street parking or are not needed by the city for any other purpose and are available for such use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 713.)
-------------------------------------------

35301.

The legislative body, at any time after the filing of a petition for the formation of such district, may by ordinance declare and agree that city lands shall for all purposes of said district be held, used and treated in all respects the same as parking places acquired with the proceeds of bonds issued under this part. Such ordinance shall not become effective until said district shall have been formed and bonds shall have been issued for such district, as provided in this part. If such ordinance is adopted and becomes effective, such city lands shall be so held, used and treated and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the revenues from the operation of off-street parking facilities thereon may be pledged and used for the same purposes as those for which revenues from parking facilities acquired or improved with proceeds of such bonds may be pledged and used. The ordinance shall describe the city lands to be so held, used and treated and shall state the amount of compensation, if any, to be paid the city therefor and the manner in which said compensation is to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 713.)
-------------------------------------------

35302.

The petition for the formation of the district under this part may propose that the legislative body shall adopt such an ordinance with respect to any city lands, and may propose improvements to be made or constructed thereon and shall state the amount of compensation, if any, to be paid to the city therefor and the manner in which compensation is to be paid. In the event that the petition proposes that the legislative body adopt such an ordinance with respect to any such city lands, the legislative body either shall reject the petition or, prior to the adoption of the resolution of intention, shall adopt with respect to such city lands the ordinance authorized by this section for the compensation, if any, provided in the petition. Failure of the petition to propose such an ordinance, or to propose such improvements, shall not prevent the legislative body from adopting such an ordinance at any time after the petition shall have been filed. If such ordinance is adopted prior to the adoption of the resolution of intention, whether said ordinance is in response to a proposal made in the petition or otherwise, the resolution of intention, in addition to the other matters required by the part, shall refer to the ordinance, shall contain a general description of such city lands and a general description of the improvements, if any, proposed to be made or constructed thereon, and shall state the amount and manner of payment of any compensation provided for in said ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 713.)
-------------------------------------------

35303.

If such ordinance is adopted after the hearing on the resolution of intention, said ordinance shall be adopted in the manner provided in this section. If no compensation is to be paid to the city for such city lands, the legislative body at any time, without further notice and hearing, may adopt such an ordinance. If a proposed ordinance provides for compensation to be paid to the city for such city lands, before adopting such proposed ordinance the legislative body shall adopt a resolution proposing the adoption of said ordinance. Said resolution shall describe the city lands to be covered by the proposed ordinance, shall specify the amount and manner of payment of the compensation to be paid the city, and shall fix a time and place for hearing objections to the adoption of said proposed ordinance. The resolution shall be published twice in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the city. The first publication shall be at least thirty (30) days prior to the date of the hearing. In cities where no such newspaper is published, the resolution shall be posted in three public places in the proposed district at least thirty (30) days prior to the date of hearing. At said hearing the legislative body shall hear and pass upon all objections and protests against the adoption of the proposed ordinance, and the decisions of the legislative body thereon shall be final and conclusive. If all protests and objections have been overruled and denied, the legislative body may adopt said ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 713.)
-------------------------------------------

35304.

Compensation to be paid the city for said city lands shall be paid only from contributions which may be made to the city for that purpose or from revenues theretofore or thereafter derived from said city lands or other lands acquired for the district as parking places. The right of the city to compensation from said revenues may be made subordinate to the rights of the holders of any bonds thereafter to be issued by the city under this part for the district; provided, however, that if at the time of adoption of the ordinance there are outstanding bonds issued by the city under this part for the district, the right of the city to compensation from said revenues shall be subordinate to any rights of the holders of such bonds to such revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 713.)
-------------------------------------------

35305.

Whenever an ordinance is adopted pursuant to this section, whether in response to a proposal made in the petition or otherwise, the legislative body may, at the hearing on the resolution of intention or subsequent thereto, increase, decrease, eliminate, change or otherwise modify the lands to be so held, used and treated, the improvements to be made or constructed thereon, or the compensation to be paid the city for said city lands, in the same manner and by the same procedure as provided in this part for increasing, decreasing, changing or otherwise modifying the acquisitions and improvements to be made, and in that event the legislative body shall adopt a new ordinance pursuant to this chapter consistent with such changes and repealing the prior ordinance or shall amend the prior ordinance. No such increase, decrease, elimination, change or other modification shall be made in violation of the provisions of any ordinance, resolution or indenture providing for bonds already issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1870.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Bonds, Acquisitions and Improvements [35402. - 35432.]

35402.

The legislative body may by ordinance, resolution, or indenture provide for the issuance of bonds of the district in an amount not exceeding the amount estimated to be necessary to make the proposed acquisitions and improvements, to pay the incidental expenses in connection therewith and the proceedings therefor and to establish a reserve fund for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds, and for working capital and interest during the period of construction and for a period of not to exceed six (6) months thereafter, less any amount to be contributed by the city for such purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

35402.2.

If at any time the legislative body finds that the proceeds of the bonds first issued will be insufficient to make all of the acquisitions and improvements described in the ordinance declaring the district formed and to pay the additional items specified in Section 35402, it may at one time or from time to time issue additional bonds to the extent permitted by the provisions, conditions and covenants contained in the ordinances, resolutions or indentures providing for the issuance of any bonds previously issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35402.3.

If at any time, either before or after issuing bonds, the legislative body so determines, it may at one time or from time to time add to, eliminate, change or otherwise modify any of the proposed acquisitions and improvements after notice and hearing in the same manner as provided in Sections 35270 to 35272, inclusive, but no such addition, elimination, change or modification shall be made unless following such hearing the legislative body shall determine that all of the territory within the district as originally formed or as changed pursuant to Section 35402.4, as the case may be, will be benefited by the acquisitions and improvements remaining after such addition, elimination, change or modification. Any such addition, elimination, change or modification shall be effected by an ordinance amending the ordinance declaring the district formed and describing the acquisitions and improvements to be made. No such addition, elimination, change or modification shall be made in violation of the provisions of any ordinance, resolution or indenture providing for bonds already issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

35402.4.

At any time prior to the issuance of bonds, the legislative body may change the boundaries of the district after notice and hearing in the same manner as provided in Sections 35270 to 35272, but no such change shall be made unless following such hearing the legislative body shall determine that all of the territory within the district as changed will be benefited by the acquisitions and improvements originally ordered or the acquisitions and improvements as changed pursuant to Section 35402.3, as the case may be. Any such change in boundaries shall be effected by an ordinance amending the ordinance declaring the district formed. Proceedings under this section may be combined with proceedings under Section 35402.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1870.)
-------------------------------------------

35403.

The legislative body shall describe the form of bonds and of the interest coupons to be attached thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35404.

The bonds shall all mature within 35 years after the date thereof and shall be payable at the times and at the place to be fixed by the legislative body and designated in the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35405.

The legislative body may make all or any portion of the bonds callable for redemption before maturity at such time, price, and other conditions as it determines. Any bond callable before maturity shall contain a recital to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35406.

The bonds shall be issued in such denomination or denominations as the legislative body may prescribe and payable on the day fixed in the bonds, with interest at the rate specified in the bonds. The interest rate shall not be in excess of the maximum stated in the resolution of intention and shall be paid semiannually, except the first interest coupon may be for a different period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

35407.

The bonds shall be signed by the mayor of the city or by such other officer as the legislative body in the ordinance, resolution or indenture authorizes and designates for that purpose and by the treasurer, and countersigned by the clerk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1870.)
-------------------------------------------

35408.

The interest coupons on the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and signed by the treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35409.

All of the signatures on the bonds and interest coupons may be made by printed, lithographed, or engraved facsimile except the countersignature of the clerk, which shall be manually affixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35410.

If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, his signature or countersignature shall nevertheless be valid for all purposes, the same as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35411.

The bonds shall state in substance that:

(a) The bond and interest are payable solely from:

(1) The gross or net, as the case may be, revenues from the operation of the parking place or places acquired and improved with the proceeds, if such is the case.

(2) The net revenues, or a portion thereof, from parking meters on certain public ways within the district, if such is the case.

(3) To the extent provided in this part, from a limited (stating the limits) ad valorem assessment to be levied upon taxable real property in the district, if such be the case.

(b) Neither the city nor any of its officers is to be held otherwise liable for its principal or interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35412.

The ordinance, resolution, or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds may also provide for the maintenance and operation of the parking facilities, for the fixing and collecting of rentals, fees and charges for the use of parking facilities, for the establishment of a special fund into which all revenues derived from the operation of the parking facilities shall be placed, for the use of moneys in this fund for payment of the expenses of operating and maintaining the parking places, for the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon, or for the establishment and maintenance of any reserve funds, sinking funds or other funds designed for securing or paying the bonds and the interest thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35413.

The ordinance, resolution, or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds may also provide for the installation of parking meters on the public ways within the district, to the extent they have not already been installed, for the maintenance of meters on the public ways for the period of time specified in the resolution of intention, for the fixing and enforcement of parking meter rates, for the establishment of a special fund into which the net revenues (or portion thereof as specified in the resolution of intention) shall be paid, and for the allocation and pledge of the net revenues, or portion thereof, to the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon, to the payment of operation and maintenance costs of the parking facilities, and to the establishment and maintenance of any reserve funds, sinking funds or other funds designed for securing or paying bonds and the interest thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35414.

The ordinance, resolution, or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds may also provide for the levy each year, if so provided in the petition and in the resolution of intention, of an ad valorem assessment on all taxable real property in the district, to the extent to which revenues from the parking lots and from parking meters pledged to the payment of principal and interest of the bonds have been or are expected to be insufficient in any year to pay the principal and interest or to the extent to which any reserve fund established for said bonds has been or will be used to pay such interest and principal. The rate of ad valorem assessment shall be fixed by the legislative body each year in accordance with the provision. The ad valorem assessment shall not exceed the limits stated in the resolution of intention. The assessment shall be levied, collected, and enforced in the same manner, at the same times, and with the same penalties and interest, as in the case of taxes levied for the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35414.1.

If the petition for the formation of a district and the resolution of intention to form the district state that this section shall apply to proceedings taken pursuant thereto, then the ordinance, resolution or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds may, in lieu of the provision permitted by Section 35414, provide for the levy each year of an ad valorem assessment on all taxable real property in the district to provide moneys for all or any part of the principal and interest on the bonds, the costs and expenses of operating and maintaining the parking places, and the establishment or maintenance of any reserve funds, sinking funds or other funds designed for securing or paying the bonds and interest thereon. The rate of ad valorem assessment shall be fixed by the legislative body each year so as to produce the sums required under such provisions; provided, that the assessment shall not exceed the limits stated in the resolution of intention. The assessment shall be levied, collected and enforced in the same manner, at the same times, and with the same penalties and interest, as in the case of taxes levied for the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35415.

The ordinance, resolution, or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds may also provide for interest and redemption funds, sinking funds, reserve funds, and any other funds necessary or convenient for use in the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35415.5.

The ordinance, resolution or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds may also provide for restrictions on the operation by the city or the district of other facilities for the public parking of motor vehicles which would compete with the facilities, the revenues of which are pledged to the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35416.

The ordinance, resolution, or indenture may also contain any other provisions, not inconsistent with this part, which are necessary or desirable to carry out its intent and purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35417.

The provisions of the ordinance, resolution, or indenture shall constitute covenants for the benefit and protection of the holders of the bonds, and any holder may enforce the covenants by mandamus or other appropriate remedy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35418.

Any provision of the ordinance, resolution, or indenture, except a provision as to the amount or time of payment of principal or interest on the bonds, may be later eliminated or modified by the legislative body, if the holders of not less than sixty percent (60%) of the outstanding bonds have agreed in writing to the elimination or modification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35419.

The legislative body may sell the bonds at a price below the par or face value, provided that the discount on any bonds so sold shall not exceed 8 percent of the par value thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

35420.

Before selling all or any part of the bonds, the legislative body shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such mannner as it prescribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35421.

If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35422.

If no bids are received, or if the legislative body determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, it may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35423.

The proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be placed in the city treasury to the credit of the proper district fund and applied exclusively to the objects and purposes for which the same were issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35424.

The proceeds may be used to pay the interest on the bonds during the period of construction of any parking place and for a period of six months thereafter, except that the total period during which interest is paid from the proceeds shall not exceed three years from the date of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35425.

The bonds and the interest coupons thereof shall be negotiable instruments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35426.

With the proceeds from the sale of the bonds and with any money which the city has agreed to contribute for the purpose, the city by and through its proper officers shall make the acquisitions and improvements finally determined upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35427.

All contracts for the construction of any improvements shall be let and entered into as other contracts are let and entered into by the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35428.

When the acquisitions and improvements have been accomplished, any unexpended bond proceeds shall be placed in any fund for the payment or securing of the principal and interest of the bonds, or may be used to pay the cost of additional acquisitions or improvements for the district, and expenses incidental thereto, pursuant to change and modification proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35429.

After the bonds and all interest thereon have been fully paid, or prior thereto to the extent permitted by express provision of the ordinance, resolution, or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds, all revenues derived from the operation of the parking facilities and not required for the operation and maintenance of the facilities may be used for the further improvement of the facilities for the benefit of the district, as the parking place commission of the district may decide. Any excess revenues shall be paid into the general fund of the city or the fees and charges reduced so that there will be no excessive revenue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35430.

Whenever a district has been formed under this part and a bonded indebtedness has been incurred for public parking facilities as provided in this part, proceedings may later be taken hereunder for the further acquisition or improvement of public parking facilities for the district and the issuance of bonds therefor as provided in this part. Any such proceedings may be initiated by the filing with the clerk of the legislative body of either a petition by the owners of real property in the district or a certified copy of a resolution adopted by the parking place commission. Any such petition or resolution shall request such proceedings and, with respect to the proposed proceedings, additional acquisitions, improvements and bonds therein requested, may contain any matters authorized and shall contain any matters required in an original petition, except that it shall not be necessary to describe the boundaries of the district. The petition shall be signed, filed and certified in the same manner provided in this part for an original petition. Thereafter the procedure specified in this part for the formation of the district and the issuance of the initial bonds shall be followed so far as applicable; provided, however, that at the hearing the legislative body shall have no power to change the boundaries of the district and the acquisitions and improvements finally ordered to be made must be ones which the legislative body, following the hearing, finds to be of benefit to the district as originally formed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1925.)
-------------------------------------------

35431.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 35429, the bonds issued under Section 35430 to provide additional public parking facilities for the district may in part be secured by revenues from facilities acquired with the proceeds of bonds previously issued, to the extent that the allocation and pledge of such revenues to payment of the additional bonds is not prohibited by the ordinance, resolution or indenture providing for the bonds previously issued. The revenues from such additional facilities may be used to pay principal and interest on bonds previously issued to the extent authorized by the ordinance, resolution or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds issued for such additional facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35432.

The bonds issued under Section 35430 to provide additional public parking facilities for the district may in part be secured by those net revenues from parking meters on public ways within the district which were allocated and pledged to the payment of bonds previously issued to the extent the allocation and pledge of such revenues to the payment of the additional bonds is not prohibited by the ordinance, resolution or indenture providing for the bonds previously issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1870.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Assessments and Bonds for Assessments [35450. - 35549.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [35450. - 35450.]

35450.

Unless otherwise provided, the definitions contained in Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 7 (the Improvement Act of 1911), govern the construction of this chapter, unless from the context of this chapter it clearly appears that a different meaning is intended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Assessments [35460. - 35483.]

35460.

If the legislative body on behalf of a district formed under this part has previously issued bonds pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35400) of this part which are payable primarily from revenues from parking places or revenues from parking meters on streets, or both, and if the legislative body determines that it would be in the best interests of the district to be relieved of the obligation to continue to produce such revenues, the legislative body may by resolution declare its intention to take proceedings under this chapter for the levy of an assessment to provide the funds necessary for the redemption of the outstanding bonds. In such resolution the legislative body shall determine the maximum interest rate on and term of the bonds to be issued to represent unpaid assessments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35461.

In the resolution, the legislative body shall order the engineer to make and deliver a diagram of the parking places for which the outstanding bonds were issued and of the property within the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35462.

The diagram shall show:

(a) The parking places for which the outstanding bonds were issued.

(b) Each separate lot or parcel of land within the district.

(c) The dimensions of each such lot or parcel of land and its relative location to the parking places for which the outstanding bonds were issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35463.

The diagram shall be delivered to the street superintendent who shall endorse the date of such delivery on the diagram.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35464.

Upon receiving the diagram, the street superintendent shall assess the total amount necessary for the redemption of the outstanding bonds against the land within the district subject to assessment, and all incidental costs and expenses in connection therewith, including, but not limited to, engineer and attorney fees, costs in connection with preparation of the diagram, and all other costs necessarily incurred or to be incurred as a result of proceeding under this chapter. The assessment shall be in proportion to the benefits derived from the parking place for which such bonds were issued. The total amount necessary for the redemption of the outstanding bonds shall include the principal thereof, the interest thereon to maturity or to the first available call date, and the premiums which must be paid to call the bonds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35465.

All land within the district shall be assessed to provide the funds necessary for the redemption of the outstanding bonds, except:

(a) Land owned by the United States.

(b) Streets, alleys, and highways.

(c) Property acquired for parking places pursuant to this part.

(d) Public property exempt from assessment pursuant to Section 35466.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35466.

A lot or parcel of land in a public use belonging to the state or to a county, city, district, or other public corporation, public agent, mandatory of the government, school board, educational, penal or reform institution, or facility for the housing of persons with developmental or intellectual disabilities or mental health disorders in use in the performance of a public function and lying within the district is not subject to assessment unless the consent of its governing body to the assessment is filed with the legislative body at or prior to the confirmation of the assessment. If that consent is filed, the land is subject to assessment in the same manner as other land within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 55.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

35467.

An assessment upon public property is an enforceable obligation against the owner or the governing body controlling the property and shall be paid by the officer or board having charge of the disbursement of its funds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35468.

If no money is available for the payment of an assessment of public property, the board or officer whose duty it is to levy taxes for the owner of the public property shall include in the next tax levy an amount, in addition to money for all other purposes, sufficient to pay the assessment and the interest thereon from the date the assessment is recorded, at the rate established for the bonds. When the money received from the tax levy is available, the assessment and interest shall be paid by the officer or board having charge of the disbursement of the funds of the owner.

Any duty imposed by this section and Section 35467 may be enforced by action, mandamus, or other proceeding.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35469.

The assessment shall be made, notice given, hearing held, and the assessment confirmed and recorded substantially in the manner provided in Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 5360) of Part 3 of Division 7 (the Improvement Act of 1911), and the provisions of that chapter relating to the method of making or spreading the assessment, the giving of notice, the making and waiving of objections, appeals or protests, the holding of the hearing, the finality and conclusiveness of the decisions and determinations of the legislative body, and the confirmation and recordation of the assessment are adopted as the procedure to be followed pursuant to this chapter. Except as provided by this chapter, all of the powers and authority granted in Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 5360) of Part 3 of Division 7 (the Improvement Act of 1911) are applicable to any assessment to be levied pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

35469.5.

The notice published pursuant to Section 5362 and the notices mailed pursuant to Section 5363 shall also contain a statement that the legislative body has declared its intention to take proceedings under this chapter for the levy of an assessment to provide funds necessary for the redemption of the outstanding bonds and shall state the maximum interest rate on and term of bonds to be issued to represent unpaid assessments. The notice shall also state that any person who has any objection to such proceedings for the levy of such assessment may file a written protest not later than the hour set for the hearing as stated in said notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

35469.6.

At the hearing and prior to consideration of the correctness of the assessment and diagram, the legislative body shall hear and consider all protests to the proceedings for the levy of that assessment. The notice, hearing, and protest procedures shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

The Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931 (commencing with Section 2800) shall not apply to proceedings under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 636, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

35469.7.

If there is no such majority protest and if all protests to the proceedings are overruled, the legislative body may proceed with the hearing on the correctness of the assessment and diagram and may confirm the assessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35469.8.
